District of Columbia statutes.
10-503.12

Public travel in and occupancy of restricted.

Public travel in and occupancy of said United States Capitol Grounds shall be restricted to the roads, walks, and places prepared for that purpose by flagging, paving, or otherwise.

History

July 31, 1946, 60 Stat. 718, ch. 707, § 2

Section References

This section is referenced in § 10-503.18 and § 10-503.22.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 9-108.
1973 Ed., § 9-119.